Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-19,144
Decree of dissolution.

(a) If after a hearing the district court determines that one or more grounds for judicial dissolution described in section 21-19,141 exist, it may enter a decree dissolving the corporation and specifying the effective date of the dissolution, and the clerk of the district court shall deliver a certified copy of the decree to the Secretary of State, who shall file it.

(b) After entering the decree of dissolution, the district court shall direct the winding up and liquidation of the corporation's affairs in accordance with section 21-19,134 and the notification of its claimants in accordance with sections 21-19,135 and 21-19,136.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 144.